test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-rapahutma80_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - rapahutma: # Verb (80) rapahutma 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     rapahutma+V+Inf/mA: rapahutma
     rapahutma+V+Inf: rapahutaq
     rapahutma+V+Act+PrfPrc: rapahutnuq
     rapahutma+V+Pss+PrfPrc: [rapahudõt, rapahudõtu]

     rapahutma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rapahuda
     rapahutma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [rapahudat, rapahudadõq]
     rapahutma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: rapahut
     rapahutma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: rapahudamiq
     rapahutma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: rapahudatiq
     rapahutma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: rapahutvaq
     rapahutma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: rapahudi
     rapahutma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [rapahudit, rapahudiq, rapahudidõq]
     rapahutma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: rapahutʼ
     rapahutma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: rapahudimiq
     rapahutma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: rapahuditiq
     rapahutma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [rapahudiq, rapahudivaq]
     rapahutma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNegII: rapahuda

     rapahutma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rapahudõda
     rapahutma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: rapahudõtas

     rapahutma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: rapahutva

     rapahutma+V+Jus: rapahutkuq
